Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-294.03
Appropriation; temporary transfer or change; effect on classification and valuation.

For purposes of assessment pursuant to sections 77-1343 to 77-1363, neither the temporary transfer or change of an appropriation nor any resulting land-use changes on the land to which the appropriation was appurtenant prior to the transfer or change shall cause the land to be reclassified to a lower value use or the valuation of the land to be reduced, but the land may be reclassified to a higher value use and its valuation may be increased if a higher value use is made of the land while the temporary transfer or change is in effect. Land from which an appropriation has been permanently transferred shall be classified and valued for tax purposes in accordance with the use of the land after the transfer.

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 23.